Virginia statutes. Title 20. Domestic Relations.
Article 9.
Registration and Modification of Child Support Order.

§ 20-88.74. Procedure to register child support order of another state for modification.

A party or support enforcement agency seeking to modify, or to modify and enforce, a child support order issued in another state shall register that order in this Commonwealth in the same manner as provided in Article 8 (§ 20-88.66 et seq.) if the order has not been registered. A petition for modification may be filed at the same time as a request for registration, or later. The pleading must specify the grounds for modification.

(1994, c. 673; 1997, c. 69.)

§ 20-88.75. Effect of registration for modification.

A tribunal of the Commonwealth may enforce a child support order of another state, registered for purposes of modification, in the same manner as if the order had been issued by a tribunal of the Commonwealth, but the registered support order may be modified only if the requirements of § 20-88.76 or 20-88.77:1 have been met.

(1994, c. 673; 2005, c. 754; 2015, c. 727.)

The 2005 amendments.

- The 2005 amendment by c. 754 substituted "the" for "this" in two places and inserted "20-88.77:1 or 20-88.77:3."

The 2015 amendments.

- The 2015 amendment by c. 727, effective April 15, 2015, inserted "support" and substituted "
§
20-88.76 or 20-88.77:1" for "

§

20-88.76, 20-88.77:1 or 20-88.77:3."

§ 20-88.76. Modification of child support order of another state.

If § 20-88.77:1 does not apply, upon petition a tribunal of the Commonwealth may modify a child support order, issued in another state, that is registered in the Commonwealth if, after notice and hearing, the tribunal finds that:

The following requirements are met:

Neither the child, nor the obligee who is an individual, nor the obligor resides in the issuing state;

A petitioner who is a nonresident of the Commonwealth seeks modification; and

The respondent is subject to the personal jurisdiction of the tribunal of the Commonwealth; or

The Commonwealth is the residence of the child or a party who is an individual is subject to the personal jurisdiction of the tribunal of the Commonwealth and all of the individual parties who are individuals have filed consents in a record in the issuing tribunal for a tribunal of the Commonwealth to modify the support order and assume continuing, exclusive jurisdiction.

Modification of a registered child support order is subject to the same requirements, procedures, and defenses that apply to the modification of an order issued by a tribunal of the Commonwealth and the order may be enforced and satisfied in the same manner.

A tribunal of the Commonwealth may not modify any aspect of a child support order that may not be modified under the law of the issuing state, including the duration of the obligation of support. If two or more tribunals have issued child support orders for the same obligor and same child, the order that controls and shall be so recognized under § 20-88.41 establishes the aspects of the support order which are nonmodifiable.

In a proceeding to modify a child support order, the law of the state that is determined to have issued the initial controlling order governs the duration of the obligation of support. The obligor's fulfillment of the duty of support established by that order precludes imposition of a further obligation of support by a tribunal of the Commonwealth.

On issuance of an order by a tribunal of the Commonwealth modifying a child support order issued in another state, the tribunal of the Commonwealth becomes the tribunal having continuing, exclusive jurisdiction.

Notwithstanding subsections A through E and § 20-88.35, a tribunal of the Commonwealth retains jurisdiction to modify an order issued by a tribunal of the Commonwealth if one party resides in another state and the other party resides outside the United States.

(1994, c. 673; 1997, cc. 797, 897; 2005, c. 754; 2015, c. 727.)

The 2005 amendments.

- The 2005 amendment by c. 754 rewrote subsection A, in subsection C, inserted "Except as otherwise provided in
§
20-88.77:3" at the beginning of the first sentence and inserted "including the duration of the obligation of support" at the end, added present subsection D, redesignated former subsection D as subsection E, inserted "by a tribunal of the Commonwealth" in subsection E and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2015 amendments.

- The 2015 amendment by c. 727, effective April 15, 2015, deleted "except as otherwise provided in
§
20-88.77:3" preceding "upon" in subsection A; deleted "state of" preceding "residence" in subdivision A 2; substituted "A tribunal" for "Except as otherwise provided in

§

20-88.77:3, a tribunal" in subsection C; added subsection F.

§ 20-88.77. Recognition of order modified in another state.

If a child support order issued by a tribunal of the Commonwealth is modified by a tribunal of another state that assumed jurisdiction pursuant to the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act, a tribunal of the Commonwealth:

May enforce its order that was modified only as to arrears and interest accruing before the modification;

May provide appropriate relief for violations of its order that occurred before the effective date of the modification; and

Shall recognize the modifying order of the other state, upon registration, for the purpose of enforcement.

(1994, c. 673; 1997, cc. 797, 897; 2005, c. 754.)

The 2005 amendments.

- The 2005 amendment by c. 754 rewrote the section.

§ 20-88.77:1. Jurisdiction to modify support order of another state when individual parties reside in this Commonwealth.

If all of the parties who are individuals reside in this Commonwealth and the child does not reside in the issuing state, a tribunal of this Commonwealth has jurisdiction to enforce and to modify the issuing state's child support order in a proceeding to register that order.

A tribunal of this Commonwealth exercising jurisdiction as provided in this section shall apply the provisions of Articles 1 (§ 20-88.32 et seq.) and 2 (§ 20-88.35 et seq.), this article and the procedural and substantive law of this Commonwealth to the enforcement or modification. Articles 3 through 5 (§ 20-88.37 et seq.) and Articles 7 (§ 20-88.64 et seq.) and 8 (§ 20-88.66 et seq.) do not apply.

(1997, cc. 797, 897.)

§ 20-88.77:2. Notice to issuing tribunal of modification.

Within thirty days after issuance of a modified child support order, the party obtaining the modification shall file a certified copy of the order with the issuing tribunal that had continuing, exclusive jurisdiction over the earlier order, and in each tribunal in which the party knows the earlier order has been registered. A party who obtains the order and fails to file a certified copy is subject to appropriate sanctions by a tribunal in which the issue of failure to file arises. The failure does not affect the validity or enforceability of the modified order of the new tribunal having continuing, exclusive jurisdiction.

(1997, cc. 797, 897.)

§ 20-88.77:3. Jurisdiction to modify child support order of foreign country.

Except as provided in § 20-88.93, if a foreign country lacks or refuses to exercise jurisdiction to modify its child support order pursuant to its laws, a tribunal of the Commonwealth may assume jurisdiction, for good cause shown as ordered, to modify the child support order and bind all individuals subject to the personal jurisdiction of the tribunal whether or not the consent to modification of a child support order otherwise required of the individual pursuant to § 20-88.76 has been given or whether the individual seeking modification is a resident of the Commonwealth or of the foreign country.

An order issued by a tribunal of the Commonwealth modifying a foreign child support order pursuant to this section is the controlling order.

(2005, c. 754; 2015, c. 727.)

The 2015 amendments.

- The 2015 amendment by c. 727, effective April 15, 2015, in subsection A, substituted "Except as provided in
§
20-88.93, if a foreign country lacks or refuses to exercise jurisdiction to modify its child support order" for "If a foreign country or political subdivision that is a state will not or may not modify its order" and deleted "or political subdivision" from the end; and inserted "by a tribunal of the Commonwealth modifying a foreign child support order" in subsection B.

§ 20-88.77:4. Procedure to register child support order of foreign country for modification.

A party or support enforcement agency seeking to modify, or to modify and enforce, a foreign child support order not under the Convention may register that order in the Commonwealth under Article 8 (§ 20-88.66 et seq.) if the order has not been registered. A petition for modification may be filed at the same time as a request for registration or at another time. The petition must specify the grounds for modification.

(2015, c. 727.)

Editor's note.

- Acts 2015, c. 727, cl. 3 made this section effective April 15, 2015, by emergency.